Utah statutes.
10-9a-517.   Municipal ordinances governing elderly residential facilities.

(1)  Each municipality shall adopt ordinances that establish that a residential facility for elderly persons is a permitted use in any area where residential dwellings are allowed, except an area zoned to permit exclusively single-family dwellings.

(2)  The ordinances shall establish a permit process that may require only that:

(a)  the facility meet each building, safety, land use, and health ordinance applicable to similar dwellings;

(b)  adequate off-street parking space be provided;

(c)  the facility be capable of use as a residential facility for elderly persons without structural or landscaping alterations that would change the structure's residential character;

(d)  residential facilities for elderly persons be reasonably dispersed throughout the municipality;

(e)  no person being treated for alcoholism or drug abuse be placed in a residential facility for elderly persons; and

(f)  placement in a residential facility for elderly persons be on a strictly voluntary basis and not a part of, or in lieu of, confinement, rehabilitation, or treatment in a correctional facility.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

